Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-945
Supplemental retirement benefit; receipt by beneficiary; duration.

If a retiree eligible for the supplemental benefit under section 79-942 dies subsequent to July 19, 1980, the beneficiary shall be entitled to the supplemental benefit until the expiration of the annuity option selected by the retired member.

Laws 1980, LB 228, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1563;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 580.